Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Reformation, Modification, Division, Consolidation, and Termination of Trusts

53-12-60.
Reformation to correct mistakes.

If it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that the trust provisions were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement, the court may reform the trust provisions, even if unambiguous, to conform the provisions to the settlor’s intention.

A petition for reformation may be filed by the trustee, any trust director, or any beneficiary or, in the case of an unfunded testamentary trust, the personal representative of the settlor’s estate.

Notice of a petition for reformation of the trust shall be given to the trustee, any trust director, and all qualified beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-75/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, any trust director,” in subsection (b); and substituted “, any trust director, and all qualified beneficiaries” for “and all beneficiaries” in subsection (c).

53-12-61.
Power to direct modification or termination; petition to modify or terminate irrevocable trust; proceeding to approve proposed modification or termination; distribution of trust property under order for termination; waiver of notice.

The trust instrument may confer upon a trustee or other person a power to modify or terminate the trust without court approval.

During the settlor’s lifetime, the court shall approve a petition to modify or terminate an irrevocable trust, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, if the settlor and all qualified beneficiaries consent to such modification or termination and the trustee has received notice of the proposed modification or termination. A settlor’s power to consent to such trust’s modification or termination may be exercised by:

An agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the power of attorney and the provisions of the trust;

The settlor’s conservator with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship if an agent is not so authorized; or

The settlor’s guardian with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship if an agent is not so authorized and a conservator has not been appointed.

Following the settlor’s death the court shall approve a petition to:

Modify an irrevocable trust if all qualified beneficiaries consent, the trustee has received notice of the proposed modification, and the court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with any material purpose of such trust; and

Terminate an irrevocable trust if all qualified beneficiaries consent, the trustee has received notice of the proposed termination, and the court concludes that continuance of such trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of such trust.

The court may, upon petition:

Modify the trust if, owing to circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification would further the purposes of such trust;

Modify the administrative provisions of a trust if continuation of such trust under its existing provisions would impair such trust’s administration;

Modify the trust by the appointment of an additional trustee or special fiduciary if such appointment is necessary or helpful to the administration of such trust;

Modify the trust to achieve the settlor’s tax objectives, with such modification to have either prospective or retroactive effect;

Order the division of a single trust into two or more trusts or the consolidation of two or more trusts, whether created by the same or different trust instruments or by the same or different persons, into a single trust if the division or consolidation would be helpful to the administration of such trust or trusts; or

Terminate a trust and order distribution of the trust property if the:

Costs of administration are such that the continuance of such trust, the establishment of such trust if it is to be established, or the distribution from a probate estate would defeat or substantially impair the purposes of such trust;

Purpose of such trust has been fulfilled or become illegal or impossible to fulfill; or

Continuance of such trust would impair the accomplishment of the purposes of such trust.

A proceeding to approve a proposed modification or termination under this Code section may be commenced by a trustee, trust director, or beneficiary. A proceeding to approve a proposed modification or termination under subsection (b) of this Code section may be commenced by a trustee, trust director, beneficiary, or settlor. In the case of an unfunded testamentary trust, a petition for modification or termination under this Code section may be filed by the personal representative of the settlor’s estate.

Notice of a petition to modify or terminate a trust under subsection (d) of this Code section shall be given to the settlor, if living, the trustee, any trust director, all qualified beneficiaries, any holder of a power of appointment over the trust property, and such other persons as the court may direct.

The court may modify or terminate a trust as provided in this Code section regardless of whether it contains spendthrift provisions or other similar protective provisions.

An order under subsection (d) of this Code section shall conform as nearly as practicable to the intention of the settlor.

Distribution of the trust property under an order for termination shall be made to or among the current beneficiaries and the vested remainder beneficiaries, or, if there are no vested remainder beneficiaries, among the current beneficiaries and the contingent remainder beneficiaries. The order shall specify the appropriate share, if any, of each current and remainder beneficiary who is to share in the proceeds of the trust so as to conform as nearly as practicable to the intention of the settlor. The order may direct that the interest of a minor beneficiary, or any portion thereof, be converted into qualifying property and distributed to a custodian pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, “The Georgia Transfers to Minors Act.”

For purposes of this chapter, modification of a trust includes the consolidation or division of a trust.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not apply to charitable trusts.

Petitioning for or consenting to a modification or termination under this Code section shall not constitute a violation of a condition in terrorem under Code Section 53-12-22.

Unless the trustee:

Expressly waives notice in a writing signed by the trustee, notice to the trustee under subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section shall be given by delivery of a copy of the petition by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested and with delivery restricted to addressee only at least 31 days before the entry of an order granting the petition; and

Expressly waives notice and assents to the petition in a writing signed by the trustee, the trustee shall have standing to intervene as a matter of right pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and subsection (c) of Code Section 9-11-24 and to file a caveat or objection to the petition showing that one or more of the applicable requirements of subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section has or have not been satisfied, provided that the trustee must file any such pleadings provided by this division not more than 30 days following the express written waiver of notice by the trustee or delivery of notice to the trustee as provided in division (i) of this subparagraph or by such later date as the court may direct pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Unless a person to be given notice under subsection (f) of this Code section:

Expressly waives notice in a writing signed by such person, such notice shall be given by delivery of a copy of the petition by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested at least 31 days before the entry of an order granting the petition;

Expressly waives notice and assents to the petition in a writing signed by such person, such person shall have standing to intervene as a matter of right pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and subsection (c) of Code Section 9-11-24 and to file a caveat or objection to the petition showing that one or more of the applicable requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section has or have not been satisfied, provided that such person must file any such pleadings provided by this division not more than 30 days following the express written waiver of notice by such person or delivery of notice to such person as provided in division (i) of this subparagraph or by such later date as the court may direct pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, and further provided that such person is the settlor, the trustee, a trust director, a qualified beneficiary, or the holder of a power of appointment over the trust property; and

Expressly waives notice and assents to the petition in a writing signed by such person, such person may file a motion for permissive intervention pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Code Section 9-11-24 and a caveat or objection to the petition showing that one or more of the applicable requirements of subsection (d) of this Code section has or have not been satisfied, provided that such person must file any such pleadings provided by this division not more than 30 days following the express written waiver of notice by such person or delivery of notice to such person as provided in division (i) of this subparagraph or by such later date as the court may direct pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, and further provided that the court shall deny such motion for permissive intervention and dismiss such caveat or objection unless such person satisfactorily demonstrates to the court that he or she is a person whose interests would be affected directly and adversely by the grant of the petition.

The petitioner shall certify to the court that notice has been waived or given in compliance with paragraph (1) of this subsection in a writing signed by the petitioner or by counsel for the petitioner and filed with the clerk to which all applicable executed waivers and return receipts are attached as exhibits.

The court may direct any additional notice or extend the time to respond to a petition under this Code section as the judge may determine to be proper in the interests of due process and reasonable opportunity for any affected person or interest to be heard.

The court may, in its sound discretion, conduct a hearing on a petition under this Code section, but such hearing shall not be required if no caveat or objection is timely filed by a person having standing under division (m)(1)(A)(ii) or (m)(1)(B)(ii) of this Code section or by a person granted permission to intervene by the court pursuant to division (m)(1)(B)(iii) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 7/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-76/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “, consolidate, divide,” following “power to modify” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), in the first sentence in the introductory language, substituted “an irrevocable trust” for “a noncharitable irrevocable trust” and substituted “qualified beneficiaries” for “the beneficiaries”; substituted “provisions” for “terms” in paragraph (b)(1); substituted “an irrevocable trust if all qualified beneficiaries” for “a noncharitable irrevocable trust if all the beneficiaries” in paragraph (c)(1) and in paragraph (c)(2); inserted “trust director,” in the first and second sentences in subsection (e); in subsection (f), substituted “No later than 30 days after filing the petition for modification or termination, notice” for “Notice” at the beginning and substituted “if living, the trustee, any trust director, all qualified beneficiaries” for “the trustee, all the beneficiaries”; and added subsections (j) through (n).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

For article, “To Tax or Not to Tax: State Income Tax on Trusts After North Carolina Department of Revenue v. The Kimberly Rice Kaestner 1992 Family Trust,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J 26 (Feb. 2020).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-62.
Power of trustee to invade principal of original trust.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Original trust” refers to the trust from which principal is being distributed.

“Second trust” refers to the trust to which assets are being distributed from the original trust, whether a separate trust or an amended version of the original trust.

As used in this subsection, the term “current beneficiary” means a person who, on the date of distribution to the second trust, is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal.

Unless the original trust instrument expressly provides otherwise, a trustee, other than a person who contributed property to the trust, with authority to invade the principal of the original trust to make distributions to or for the benefit of one or more of the beneficiaries may also, independently or with court approval, exercise such authority by distributing all or part of the principal of the original trust to a trustee of a second trust; provided, however, that the second trust shall not include as a:

Current beneficiary any person that is not a current beneficiary of income or principal of the original trust; or

Beneficiary any person that is not a beneficiary of the original trust.

Except as provided in this Code section, a trustee may exercise the power to invade the principal of the original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section without the consent of the settlor or the beneficiaries of the original trust if such trustee provides written notice of such trustee’s decision to exercise the power to such settlor, if living, any trust director, and those persons then entitled to annual reports from the trustee of the original trust under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-243, taking into account the provisions of the original trust and subsections (c) and (d) of Code Section 53-12-243. Such notice shall:

Describe the manner in which such trustee intends to exercise such power;

Specify the date such trustee proposes to distribute to the second trust; and

Be delivered at least 30 days before the proposed distribution to the second trust.

The exercise of the power to invade the principal of the original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be by an instrument in writing, signed and acknowledged by the trustee, and filed with the records of the original trust.

The exercise of the power to invade the principal of the original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section shall not extend the permissible period of the rule against perpetuities that applies to such original trust.

The exercise of the power to invade the principal of the original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section by a trustee who is also a beneficiary shall be subject to the limitations of Code Section 53-12-270.

This Code section shall not be construed to abridge the right of any trustee who has a power of invasion to distribute property in further trust that arises under any other law or under common law, and nothing in this Code section shall be construed to imply that the common law does not permit the exercise of a power to invade the principal of a trust in the manner authorized under subsection (b) of this Code section.

A second trust may confer a power of appointment upon a beneficiary of the original trust to whom or for the benefit of whom the trustee has the power to distribute the principal of such original trust. For purposes of this subsection, the permissible appointees of the power of appointment conferred upon a beneficiary may include persons who are not beneficiaries of such original trust or second trust.

If any contribution to the original trust qualified for the annual exclusion under Section 2503(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, the marital deduction under Section 2056(a) or 2523(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, or the charitable deduction under Section 170(a), 642(c), 2055(a), or 2522(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, is a direct skip qualifying for treatment under Section 2642(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, or qualified for any other specific tax benefit that would be lost by the existence of the authorized trustee’s authority under subsection (b) of this Code section for income, gift, estate, or generation-skipping transfer tax purposes under the federal Internal Revenue Code, then the authorized trustee shall not have the power to distribute the principal of a trust pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section in a manner that would prevent the contribution to the original trust from qualifying for such exclusion, deduction, or other tax benefit or would reduce such exclusion, deduction, or other tax benefit that was originally claimed with respect to such contribution.

The exercise of the power to invade the principal of the original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section shall be subject to the following limitations:

The second trust need not qualify as a grantor trust for federal income tax purposes, even if the original trust does qualify as a grantor trust, except that if such original trust qualifies as a grantor trust because of the application of Section 672(f)(2)(A) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, such second trust may not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the original trust instrument, would have prevented such original trust from qualifying under such section;

Unless the settlor objects in a writing delivered to the trustee before the date the trustee proposes to distribute from the original trust to the second trust, such second trust may qualify as a grantor trust for federal income tax purposes, even if such original trust does not so qualify, except that if such original trust does not so qualify and such second trust will so qualify, in whole or in part, with respect to the settlor, such second trust shall grant such settlor or another person a power that would cause such second trust to cease to be a grantor trust for federal income tax purposes; and

When both the original trust and the second trust qualify as grantor trusts for federal income tax purposes and such original trust grants the settlor or another person the power to cause such original trust to cease to be a grantor trust, such second trust shall grant an equivalent power to the settlor or another person unless such settlor objects in a writing delivered to the trustee before the date the trustee proposes to distribute from such original trust to such second trust.

During any period when the original trust owns stock in a Subchapter “S” corporation as defined in Section 1361(a)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018, an authorized trustee shall not exercise a power authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section to distribute part or all of the stock of the Subchapter “S” corporation to a second trust that is not a permitted shareholder under Section 1361(c)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on February 1, 2018.

A trustee or other person that reasonably relies on the validity of a distribution of property of the original trust to the second trust under subsection (b) of this Code section or any other law or common law shall not be liable for any action or failure to act as a result of such reliance.

This Code section shall not create or imply a duty for a trustee or trust director to exercise a power conferred by this Code section.

If exercise of the power to invade the principal of the original trust would be effective under subsection (b) of this Code section except that the second trust in part does not comply with this Code section, such exercise of the power shall be effective, a provision in such second trust that is not permitted under this Code section shall be void to the extent necessary to comply with this Code section, and a provision required by this Code section to be in such second trust that is not contained in such second trust shall be deemed to be included in such second trust to the extent necessary to comply with this Code section.

The settlor of the original trust shall be deemed to be the settlor of the second trust with respect to the portion of the principal of the original trust subject to the exercise of the power to invade the principal of such original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section.

A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of the original trust shall be enforceable to the same extent against the property when held by the second trust after exercise of the power to invade the principal of such original trust under subsection (b) of this Code section.

This Code section shall apply to any trust the meaning and effect of whose trust provisions are determined by the law of this state.

This Code section shall not apply to charitable trusts.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 8/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-77/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (c), in the introductory language, inserted “any trust director,” and inserted “under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-243, taking into account the provisions of the original trust and subsections (c) and (d) of Code Section 53-12-243” and substituted “30 days” for “60 days” in paragraph (c)(3); added subsection (f) and redesignated former subsections (f) through (o) as present subsections (g) through (p); in paragraph (j)(2), substituted “Unless the settlor objects in a writing delivered to the trustee before the date the trustee proposes to distribute from the original trust to the second trust, such” for “The” at the beginning, substituted “such” for “the” following “even if”, and deleted “unless such settlor objects in a writing delivered to the trustee before the date the trustee proposes to distribute from such original trust to such second trust” following “tax purposes” near the end; inserted “or trust director” in subsection (m); added subsection (q) and redesignated former subsection (p) as present subsection (r); and substituted “charitable trusts” for “a trust held solely for charitable purposes” at the end of subsection (r).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-12-63.
[Reserved] Division and consolidation of trusts.

History.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 9/HB 121, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 9/HB 121 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2018.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 repeal of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-64.
[Reserved] Termination of trusts.

History.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 10/HB 121, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 10/HB 121 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2018.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 repeal of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-65.
Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property either having a total value less than $100,000.00 or for which the trustee’s annual fee for administering the trust is 5 percent or more of the market value of the principal assets of the trust as of the last day of the preceding trust accounting year may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration, provided that in the case of a cemetery trust, notice shall be given to the Attorney General. For purposes of this subsection, the term “cemetery trust” means a trust the sole purpose of which is to hold and invest property to be used for the maintenance and care of cemetery plots.

The court may modify or terminate a trust or remove a trustee and appoint a different trustee if it determines that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this Code section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

This Code section shall not apply to an easement for conservation.

This Code section shall not apply to trusts governed by Chapter 14 of Title 10.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 11/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).